de: Trägersystemtyp: Horizontaler/Flacher Träger; Aufblasbares Polster/Soft-Dachträger; J-Träger; Mit Hebeunterstützung; Mit Laderolle; Sattel; Seitenlader; Senkrechtträger; Anhänger-/Ladeflächenverlängerung; Vertikaler Träger; Sonstige
zh-TW: 載具樣式: 水平/平面攜行架; 充氣墊/軟式貨架; J 型托架; 輔助升降架; 滾筒/裝載器; 鞍座式; 側裝式; 堆疊架; 拖車/車斗延伸支架; 垂直攜行架; 其他
hr-HR: Prijevoznički stil: Horizontalni/ravni nosač tereta; Nosač na napuhavanje / mekani nosač; J-nosač; Nosač s pomoći pri podizanju; Valjak/utovarivač; Sedlasti nosač; Bočni utovar; Nosač za slaganje; Prikolica / potpora za produženje teretnog prostora; Vertikalni nosač tereta; Ostalo
da: Bæresystem: Vandret/flad holder; Oppustelig pude/blød bærer; J-formet holder; Løfteassistent; Rulle/læsser; Sadel; Sidelæsning; Stabler; Trailer-/ladforlængerstøtte; Lodret holder; Andet
fr: Type de support de transport: Porte-bagages horizontal/plat; Coussin gonflable/porte-bagages souple; Berceau en J; Assistance au levage; Rouleau/chargeur; Selle; Chargement latéral; Empileur; Remorque/support d’extension de plateforme; Porte-bagages vertical; Autre
zh-CN: 运输架类型: 水平/扁平支架; 充气垫/软架; J 型支架; 辅助升降; 滚轮/装载器; 鞍形托架; 侧载式; 堆叠式; 拖车/车箱延长架; 垂直支架; 其他
pt-BR: Estilo do transportador: Suporte horizontal/plano; Almofada inflável/bagageiro macio; Suporte em J (J-cradle); Assistente de elevação; Rolo/carregador; Suporte tipo sela; Carregamento lateral; Empilhador; Reboque/suporte extensor de caçamba; Suporte vertical; Outro
vi: Kiểu giá đỡ: Giá chở đồ ngang/phẳng; Đệm bơm hơi/giá chở đồ mềm; Giá đỡ chữ J; Hỗ trợ nâng; Con lăn/hệ thống tải; Giá đỡ dạng yên ngựa; Tải từ bên hông; Xếp chồng; Rơ-moóc/giá đỡ nối dài đuôi xe; Giá chở đồ dọc; Khác
sk-SK: Štýl nosiča: Horizontálny/plochý nosič; Nafukovacia podložka/mäkký nosič; J-nosič; S pomocou pri zdvíhaní; Valec/nakladač; Sedlo; Bočné nakladanie; Stohovač; Príves/podpora predĺženia ložnej plochy; Vertikálny nosič; Iný
pt-PT: Estilo de transportadora: Suporte horizontal/plano; Almofada insuflável/suporte macio; Suporte em J; Assistência à elevação; Rolos/carregador; Selim; Carregamento lateral; Empilhador; Reboque/suporte extensor da base; Suporte vertical; Outro
el: Στυλ φορέα: Οριζόντια/επίπεδη βάση μεταφοράς; Φουσκωτό μαξιλαράκι/μαλακή σχάρα; Βάση σχήματος J; Με υποβοήθηση ανύψωσης; Ράουλο/σύστημα φόρτωσης; Βάση τύπου σέλας; Πλευρικής φόρτωσης; Βάση στοίβαξης; Τρέιλερ/προέκταση καρότσας; Κάθετη βάση μεταφοράς; Άλλο
ko: 보트 운반대 유형: 수평/평면 캐리어; 공기 주입식 패드/소프트 랙; J-크래들; 리프트 어시스트; 롤러/로더; 새들; 사이드 로드; 스태커; 트레일러/베드 익스텐더 지지대; 수직 캐리어; 기타
it: Stile del portabebè: Portapacchi orizzontale/piatto; Cuscinetto gonfiabile/portapacchi morbido; Supporto a J; Con assistenza al sollevamento; A rullo/caricatore; A sella; Carico laterale; Supporto per impilamento; Supporto per rimorchio/estensore per pianale; Portapacchi verticale; Altro
nl: Drager stijl: Horizontale/platte drager; Opblaasbaar kussen/zacht rek; J-drager; Lift-assist; Roller/lader; Zadel; Zijlader; Stapelaar; Aanhanger/laadbakverlenger; Verticale drager; Overige
bg-BG: Тип носещ механизъм: Хоризонтален/плосък багажник; Надуваема подложка/мек багажник; J-образна стойка; С помощно повдигане; С ролка/за лесно товарене; Седловидна стойка; Странично товарене; Вертикална стойка; Ремарке/удължител за каросерия; Вертикален багажник; Друго
tr: Taşıyıcı stili: Yatay/düz taşıyıcı; Şişirilebilir ped/yumuşak taşıyıcı; J-beşik; Kaldırma destekli; Silindirli/yüklemeli; Sele; Yandan yüklemeli; İstifleyici; Römork/kasa uzatıcı desteği; Dikey taşıyıcı; Diğer
th: รูปแบบการขนส่ง: แร็คแนวนอน/แบน; แผ่นรองเป่าลม/แร็คแบบนุ่ม; โครงตัว J; แบบช่วยยก; ลูกกลิ้ง/แบบโหลด; โครงรูปอาน; แบบโหลดด้านข้าง; แบบซ้อน; ตัวรองรับส่วนขยายท้ายรถพ่วง/กระบะ; แร็คแนวตั้ง; อื่นๆ
nb: Transportørstil: Horisontalt/flatt stativ; Oppblåsbar pute / mykt stativ; J-krybbe; Løfteassistanse; Rulle/laster; Sadel; Sidelaster; Stabler; Tilhenger-/planforlengerstøtte; Vertikalt stativ; Annet
fi: Kuljetustapa: Vaakasuora/litteä teline; Ilmatäytteinen tyyny / pehmeä teline; J-teline; Nostoavustin; Rulla/lastausteline; Satula; Sivusta lastattava; Pystyteline; Perävaunu/lavanjatkeen tuki; Pystysuora teline; Muu
ro-RO: Stil transportator: Suport orizontal/plat; Pernă gonflabilă/suport moale; Suport tip J (J-cradle); Cu asistență la ridicare; Cu rolă/sistem de încărcare; Suport tip șa; Încărcare laterală; Stivuitor; Remorcă/extensie pentru platformă; Suport vertical; Altele
lt-LT: Nešiklio stilius: Horizontalus / plokščias laikiklis; Pripučiamas padėklas / minkštas laikiklis; J formos laikiklis; Su pakėlimo pagalba; Su ritinėliais / krovimo mechanizmu; Balno formos; Kraunamas iš šono; Sukraunamas; Priekabos / kėbulo prailginimo atrama; Vertikalus laikiklis; Kita
en: Carrier style: Horizontal/flat carrier; Inflatable pad/soft rack; J-cradle; Lift-assist; Roller/loader; Saddle; Side-load; Stacker; Trailer/bed extender support; Vertical carrier; Other
cs: Určuje zamýšlený způsob aplikace a zapracování produktu do koberce (nad rámec obecné formy).: Horizontální / plochý nosič; Nafukovací podložka / měkký nosič; Nosič typu J; S asistentem zvedání; S nakládacím válečkem; Sedlový nosič; S bočním nakládáním; Stohovací nosič; Podpěra pro přívěs / prodloužení korby; Vertikální nosič; Jiné
sl-SI: Slog nosilca: Vodoravni/ploski nosilec; Napihljiva podloga/mehki prtljažnik; J-nosilec; S pomočjo pri dvigu; Valjček/nakladalnik; Sedlasto; Stransko nakladanje; Nosilec za zlaganje enega na drugega (stacker); Podpora za podaljšek prikolice/kesona; Navpični nosilec; Drugo
sv: Lastarens stil: Horisontell/platt hållare; Uppblåsbar dyna/mjukt takräcke; J-vagga; Lyfthjälp; Rulle/lastare; Sadel; Sidolastning; Staplare; Stöd för släp/flakförlängare; Vertikal hållare; Annat
ru: Тип крепления для перевозки: Горизонтальное/плоское крепление; Надувная подушка/мягкий багажник; J-образное крепление; С системой помощи при подъеме; Роликовое/загрузочное крепление; Седловое крепление; С боковой загрузкой; Стойка-фиксатор; Прицеп/поддержка удлинителя кузова; Вертикальное крепление; Другое
ja: 配送業者スタイル: 水平/フラットキャリア; インフレータブルパッド/ソフトラック; Jクレードル; リフトアシスト; ローラー/ローダー; サドル; サイドロード; スタッカー; トレーラー/ベッドエクステンダーサポート; 垂直キャリア; その他
pl: Styl bagażnika: Bagażnik poziomy/płaski; Dmuchana podkładka/miękki bagażnik; Uchwyt w kształcie litery J (J-cradle); Ze wspomaganiem podnoszenia; Rolka/system załadunkowy; Uchwyt siodłowy; Boczny załadunek; Stojak pionowy (Stacker); Przedłużenie przyczepy/skrzyni ładunkowej; Bagażnik pionowy; Inne
es: Tipo de soporte para transporte: Portaequipajes horizontal/plano; Almohadilla inflable/portaequipajes blando; Soporte en J; Asistencia de elevación; Rodillo/cargador; Soporte tipo silla/cuna; Carga lateral; Apilador; Soporte para remolque/extensor de plataforma; Portaequipajes vertical; Otro
hu: Szállítókeret stílusa: Vízszintes/lapos hordozó; Felfújható párna/puha tetőcsomagtartó; J-tartó; Emelésrásegítős; Görgős/rakodó; Nyereg; Oldalról pakolható; Egymásra helyezős; Utánfutó/platóhosszabbító tartó; Függőleges hordozó; Egyéb